Vermont, session 2025-2026, H242.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 18 V.S.A. § 4301 is amended to read:
§ 4301. DEFINITIONS
(a) As used in this chapter:
* * *
(14) “Short-term rental” means a furnished house, condominium, or
other dwelling room or self-contained dwelling unit rented to the transient,
VT LEG #378761 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.242
2025 Page 2 of 5
traveling, or vacationing public for a period of fewer than 30 consecutive days
and for more than 14 days per calendar year.
(15) “Long-term resident” means, for a short-term rental, a person
whose primary residence is located on the same premises as the short-term
rental.
* * *
Sec. 2. 18 V.S.A. §§ 4469–4470a are added to read:
§ 4469. OPERATION RESTRICTIONS
Except as provided in section 4470 of this title, no person shall offer for rent
a short-term rental unless the following conditions are met:
(1) Host-occupancy restriction. A long-term resident shall reside on the
same premises as the short-term rental.
(2) Numerical restriction. A person may offer for rent not more than
one short-term rental per parcel.
§ 4470. EXEMPTION FROM OPERATION RESTRICTIONS
(a)(1) A municipality that has enacted regulations of short-term rentals
under 24 V.S.A. § 2291 may exempt from application to short-term rentals
located within the municipality the operation restrictions provided under
section 4469 of this title by majority vote of those present and voting by
Australian ballot at an annual or special meeting warned for that purpose.
VT LEG #378761 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.242
2025 Page 3 of 5
(2) A vote to exempt from application to short-term rentals located
within the municipality the operation restrictions provided under section 4469
of this title shall remain in effect until rescinded by majority vote of those
present and voting by Australian ballot at a subsequent annual or special
meeting warned for that purpose.
(b) Upon petition of not less than five percent of the legal voters of any
municipality, filed with the town clerk in conformance with 17 V.S.A. § 2642,
the warning of the annual or special meeting shall contain an article providing
for a vote upon the following questions:
Shall this municipality exempt from application to short-term rentals in
this municipality the host-occupancy restriction provided under 18 V.S.A.
§ 4469(1)?
Shall this municipality exempt from application to short-term rentals in
this municipality the numerical restriction provided under 18 V.S.A.
§ 4469(2)?
The vote under the article shall be by ballot in the following form:
Shall this municipality exempt from application to short-term rentals in
this municipality the host-occupancy restriction provided under 18 V.S.A.
§ 4469(1)?
Yes ___ No ___
VT LEG #378761 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.242
2025 Page 4 of 5
Shall this municipality exempt from application to short-term rentals in
this municipality the numerical restriction provided under 18 V.S.A.
§ 4469(2)?
Yes ___ No ___
(c) During a vote authorized by this section, the municipality shall make
available to the voters of the municipality present and voting a copy of the
language of section 4469 of this title.
§ 4470a. REGISTRATION OF SHORT-TERM RENTALS
(a) Not later than September 1 each year, a short-term rental owner or
operator shall register each short-term rental with the Department of Housing
and Community Development on a form provided by the Department of
Housing and Community Development. The form shall include the following
information:
(1) the name, address, phone number, and email address of the owner or
owners of the short-term rental;
(2) the identity of any corporation or partnership associated with the
short-term rental, including the name, address, phone number, and email
address of any principals of the corporation or partners of the partnership;
(3) the name, address, phone number, and email address of any long-
term resident;
(4) the address of the short-term rental;
VT LEG #378761 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.242
2025 Page 5 of 5
(5) the number of dwelling units at that address;
(6) the number of rental units at that address;
(7) the number of sleeping rooms in each rental unit;
(8) the maximum number of residents or guests in each rental unit;
(9) the number of parking spaces dedicated for the rental units at that
address; and
(10) and other relevant information requested by the Department of
Housing and Community Development.
(b) The Department of Housing and Community Development shall
maintain a database of the information provided and make that information
available to municipalities upon request.
Sec. 3. EFFECT ON CURRENT MUNICIPAL REGULATION OF SHORT
TERM RENTALS
Notwithstanding the requirements in 18 V.S.A. § 4470, a municipality that
has enacted regulations of short-term rentals under 24 V.S.A. § 2291 as of July
1, 2025 shall be treated as though the municipality has opted out of the
operation restrictions provided under 18 V.S.A. § 4469 and shall not be
required to hold a vote as required by 18 V.S.A. § 4470. The municipality may
vote to rescind the exemption as outlined in 18 V.S.A. § 4470.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #378761 v.1